Utah statutes.
30-8-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Premarital agreement" means an agreement between prospective spouses made in contemplation of marriage and to be effective upon marriage.

(2)  "Property" means an interest, present or future, legal or equitable, vested or contingent, in real or personal property, including income and earnings.

